Utah statutes.
53A-3-420.   Activity disclosure statements.

(1)  For a school year beginning with or after the 2012-13 school year, a local school board shall require the development of activity disclosure statements for each school-sponsored group or program which involves students and faculty in grades 9 through 12 in contests, performances, events, or other activities that require them to miss normal class time or takes place outside regular school time.

(2)  The activity disclosure statements shall be disseminated to the students desiring involvement in the specific activity or to the students' parents or legal guardians or to both students and their parents.

(3)  An activity disclosure statement shall contain the following information:

(a)  the specific name of the team, group, or activity;

(b)  the maximum number of students involved;

(c)  whether or not tryouts are used to select students, specifying date and time requirements for tryouts, if applicable;

(d)  beginning and ending dates of the activity;

(e)  a tentative schedule of the events, performances, games, or other activities with dates, times, and places specified if available;

(f)  if applicable, designation of any nonseason events or activities, including an indication of the status, required, expected, suggested, or optional, with the dates, times, and places specified;

(g)  personal costs associated with the activity;

(h)  the name of the school employee responsible for the activity; and

(i)  any additional information considered important for the students and parents to know.



Amended by Chapter 305, 2010 General Session

